Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Article II. Definitions and Rules of Construction

§ 1802.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this compact, and of any supplemental or concurring legislation enacted pursuant thereto, except as may be otherwise required by the context:

“Commission” means the Commission established by this compact.

“Compact” means this Interstate Compact.

“Region” means the territorial limits of the states which are or become parties to this compact.

“Participating state” means a state which has become a party to this compact by the enactment of concurring legislation.

“Regulated area” means any area within the region governed by and defined in regulations establishing a compact over-order price or commission marketing order.

“Pool plant” means any milk plant located in a regulated area.

“Partially regulated plant” means a milk plant not located in a regulated area but having Class I distribution within such area, or receipts from producers located in such area. Commission regulations may exempt plants having such distribution or receipts in amounts less than the limits defined therein.

“Compact over-order price” means a minimum price required to be paid to producers for Class I milk established by the Commission in regulations adopted pursuant to sections 1810 and 1811 of this compact, which is above the price established in federal marketing orders or by state farm price regulation in the regulated area. Such price may apply throughout the region or in any part or parts thereof as defined in the regulations of the Commission.

“Commission marketing order” means regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to sections 1810 and 1811 of this compact in place of a terminated federal marketing order or state dairy regulation. Such order may apply throughout the region or in any part or parts thereof as defined in the regulations of the Commission. Such order may establish minimum prices for any or all classes of milk.

“Milk” means the lacteal secretion of cows and includes all skim, butterfat, or other constituents obtained from separation or any other process. The term is used in its broadest sense and may be further defined by the Commission for regulatory purposes.

“Class I milk” means milk disposed of in fluid form or as a fluid milk product, subject to further definition in accordance with the principles expressed in subsection (b) of section 1803 of this compact.

“State dairy regulation” means any state regulation of dairy prices, and associated assessments, whether by statute, marketing order or otherwise.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1803.
Rules of construction.

This compact shall not be construed to displace existing federal milk marketing orders or state dairy regulation in the region but to supplement them. In the event some or all federal orders in the region are discontinued, the compact shall be construed to provide the Commission the option to replace them with one or more commission marketing orders pursuant to this compact.

This compact shall be construed liberally in order to achieve the purposes and intent enunciated in section 1801 of this compact. It is the intent of this compact to establish a basic structure by which the Commission may achieve those purposes through the application, adaptation, and development of the regulatory techniques historically associated with milk marketing and to afford the Commission broad flexibility to devise regulatory mechanisms to achieve the purposes of this compact. In accordance with this intent, the technical terms which are associated with market order regulation and which have acquired commonly understood general meanings are not defined herein but the Commission may further define the terms used in this compact and develop additional concepts and define additional terms as it may find appropriate to achieve its purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.